pt-BR: Casco design: Deslocamento; Fundo chato; Híbrido; Planeio; Semi-planeio; Outro
hr-HR: Dizajn trupa: Istisninski; Ravno dno; Hibridni; Gliserski; Polugliserski; Ostalo
el: Σχεδιασμός κύτους: Εκτοπίσματος; Επίπεδος πυθμένας; Υβριδικό; Πλαναρίσματος; Ημι-πλαναρίσματος; Άλλο
sk-SK: Dizajn trupu: Výtlačný; Plochý trup; Hybridný; Kĺzavý; Polkĺzavý; Iné
ru: Конструкция корпуса: Водоизмещающий; Плоскодонный; Гибридный; Глиссирующий; Полуглиссирующий; Другое
it: Design dello scafo: Dislocamento; Fondo piatto; Ibrido; Planante; Semi-planante; Altro
sv: Skrovdesign: Deplacement; Platt botten; Hybrid; Planande; Halvplanande; Övrigt
vi: Thiết kế vỏ: Rẽ nước; Đáy phẳng; Lai; Lướt sóng; Bán lướt sóng; Khác
en: Hull design: Displacement; Flat bottom; Hybrid; Planing; Semi-planing; Other
da: Skrogdesign: Deplacement; Flad bund; Hybrid; Planende; Halvplanende; Andet
cs: Návrh trupu: Výtlačný; Ploché dno; Hybridní; Klouzavý; Poloklouzavý; Ostatní
ro-RO: Designul corpului: Deplasament; Fund plat; Hibrid; De glisare; Semiglisare; Altele
ja: 船体設計: ディスプレイスメント; フラットボトム; ハイブリッド; プレーニング; セミプレーニング; その他
bg-BG: Дизайн на корпуса: Водоизместващ; С плоско дъно; Хибриден; Глисиращ; Полуглисиращ; Друго
ko: 선체 설계: 배수형; 평저형; 하이브리드; 활주형; 반활주형; 기타
fr: Conception de la coque: Déplacement; Fond plat; Hybride; Planant; Semi-planant; Autre
pt-PT: Projeto do casco: Deslocamento; Fundo plano; Híbrido; Planante; Semiplanante; Outro
hu: Hajótest kialakítása: Kiszorításos; Lapos aljú; Hibrid; Sikló; Félig sikló; Egyéb
sl-SI: Zasnova trupa: Izpodrivni; Ravno dno; Hibrid; Glisirni; Polglisirni; Drugo
fi: Rungon muotoilu: Uppouma; Tasapohja; Hybridi; Liukuva; Puoliliukuva; Muu
nb: Skrogdesign: Deplasement; Flatbunn; Hybrid; Planende; Halvplanende; Annet
zh-CN: 船体设计: 排水型; 平底型; 混合型; 滑行型; 半滑行型; 其他
th: การออกแบบตัวเรือ: กินน้ำลึก; ท้องแบน; ไฮบริด; เพลนนิง; เซมิเพลนนิง; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 船體設計: 排水型; 平底; 混合型; 滑行型; 半滑行型; 其他
de: Rumpfdesign: Verdränger; Flachboden; Hybrid; Gleiter; Halbgleiter; Sonstiges
tr: Gövde tasarımı: Deplasmanlı; Düz tabanlı; Hibrit; Kayıcı; Yarı kayıcı; Diğer
es: Diseño del casco: De desplazamiento; Fondo plano; Híbrido; De planeo; De semiplaneo; Otro
pl: Konstrukcja kadłuba: Wypornościowy; Płaskodenny; Hybrydowy; Ślizgowy; Półślizgowy; Inne
nl: Romp ontwerp: Waterverplaatsend; Platbodem; Hybride; Planerend; Half-planerend; Overig
lt-LT: Korpuso dizainas: Vandenį išstumiantis; Plokščiadugnis; Hibridinis; Glisuojantis; Pusiau glisuojantis; Kita